District of Columbia statutes.
31-2709

Violations.

Any company, broker, or agent guilty of violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any order, rule, or regulation issued pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of §§ 31-2502.03 and 31-2502.36 [repealed], respectively.

May 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 247, ch. 324, § 9
1981 Ed., § 35-1709.
1973 Ed., § 35-1509.